pt-PT: Tipo de motor de embarcação compatível: Interior; Tração a jato/PWC; Fora de borda; Interior/fora de borda (I/O); Motor de pesca; Universal; Outro
ro-RO: Tip de motor pentru ambarcațiuni compatibil: Inboard; Jet drive / PWC; Outboard; Sterndrive (I/O); Motor electric de pescuit (trolling motor); Universal; Altele
ja: 互換性のある船舶用エンジンタイプ: インボード; ジェットドライブ / PWC; アウトボード; スターンドライブ (I/O); トローリングモーター; ユニバーサル; その他
pt-BR: Tipo de motor de embarcação compatível: Motor de centro; Hidrojato / Moto aquática; Motor de popa; Motor centro-rabeta (I/O); Motor elétrico; Universal; Outro
fi: Yhteensopiva vesikulkuneuvon moottorin tyyppi: Sisämoottori; Vesisuihkuvetolaite / vesijetti; Perämoottori; Sisäperämoottori (I/O); Uistelumoottori; Universaali; Muu
ko: 호환되는 선박 엔진 유형: 인보드; 제트 드라이브/PWC; 아웃보드; 스턴 드라이브(I/O); 트롤링 모터; 범용; 기타
es: Tipo de motor de embarcación compatible: Intraborda; Motos acuáticas / propulsión a chorro; Fueraborda; Transmisión en Z (I/O); Motor de arrastre; Universal; Otro
da: Kompatibel vandfartøjsmotortype: Indenbords; Jetdrev / vandscooter (PWC); Udenbords; Hækmotor (I/O); Trollingmotor; Universal; Andet
vi: Loại động cơ đường thủy tương thích: Động cơ trong; Hệ thống phản lực / PWC; Động cơ ngoài; Động cơ Sterndrive (I/O); Động cơ điện kéo thuyền (Trolling motor); Đa năng; Khác
tr: Uyumlu deniz aracı motor tipi: İçten takmalı; Jet motoru / kişisel deniz aracı; Dıştan takmalı; Kuyruk motorlu (I/O); Trolling motoru; Evrensel; Diğer
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ motora vodného dopravného prostriedku: Zabudovaný; Prúdový pohon / PWC; Prívesný; Z-náhon (I/O); Závesný elektromotor; Univerzálne; Iné
th: ประเภทเครื่องยนต์เรือที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: เครื่องยนต์อินบอร์ด; เจ็ตไดรฟ์ / PWC; เครื่องยนต์เอาท์บอร์ด; เครื่องยนต์สเติร์นไดรฟ์ (I/O); มอเตอร์ไกด์; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 适配的水上摩托艇发动机类型: 舷内机; 喷水推进器 / 摩托艇 (PWC); 舷外机; 舷内外机 (I/O); 拖钓马达; 通用; 其他
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta motora plovila: Brodski motor; Jet pogon / PWC; Vanbrodski motor; Z-pogon (unutarnji/vanjski); Električni vanbrodski motor; Univerzalno; Ostalo
it: Tipo di motore per moto d'acqua compatibile: Entrobordo; A idrogetto / PWC; Fuoribordo; Entrofuoribordo (E/F); Motore da traina; Universale; Altro
bg-BG: Съвместим тип двигател на плавателни съдове: Бордови двигател; Джет / PWC; Извънбордови двигател; Z-образна колонка (I/O); Тролинг мотор; Универсален; Друг
pl: Kompatybilny typ silnika jednostki pływającej: Silnik stacjonarny (inboard); Napęd strugowodny / PWC; Silnik zaburtowy (outboard); Napęd Z (sterndrive I/O); Silnik dziobowy/trollingowy; Uniwersalny; Inne
el: Συμβατός τύπος κινητήρα σκάφους: Εσωλέμβια; Πρόωση Jet / PWC; Εξωλέμβια; Έσω-εξωλέμβια (I/O); Trolling motor; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
nb: Kompatibel vannscootermotortype: Innenbordsmotor; Vannjet / vannscooter; Utenbordsmotor; Hekkaggregat (I/O); Dorgemotor; Universell; Annet
ru: Совместимый тип двигателя водного транспорта: Стационарный мотор; Водомет / гидроцикл; Подвесной мотор; Угловая колонка (I/O); Троллинговый мотор; Универсальный; Другое
zh-TW: 相容的船艇引擎類型: 船內機; 噴射驅動/水上摩托車 (PWC); 船外機; 尾機 (I/O); 推進馬達; 通用; 其他
cs: Kompatibilní typ motoru plavidla: Zabudovaný; Proudový pohon / vodní skútr (PWC); Přívěsný; Z-náhon (I/O); Závěsný elektromotor (trolling motor); Univerzální; Jiné
nl: Compatibel motortype voor vaartuigen: Binnenboordmotor; Jet-aandrijving / waterscooter; Buitenboordmotor; Hekdrive (I/O); Fluistermotor; Universeel; Overige
de: Kompatibler Wasserfahrzeugmotortyp: Innenborder; Jetantrieb / PWC; Außenborder; Z-Antrieb (I/O); Trolling-Motor; Universal; Sonstige
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta motorja za plovila: Vgrajeni motor; Jet pogon / PWC; Zunanji motor; Z-pogon (I/O); Trolling motor; Univerzalno; Drugo
fr: Type de moteur d’embarcation compatible: In-board; Propulsion par jet / motomarine; Hors-bord; Semi-hors-bord (Z-drive); Moteur de traîne; Universel; Autre
lt-LT: Suderinamas vandens transporto priemonės variklio tipas: Stacionarus variklis; Vandenmetis / vandens motociklas; Pakabinamas variklis; Stacionarus-pakabinamas (I/O); Velkiavimo variklis; Universalus; Kita
en: Compatible watercraft engine type: Inboard; Jet drive / PWC; Outboard; Sterndrive (I/O); Trolling motor; Universal; Other
sv: Kompatibla motortyper: Inombordare; Vattenjet/vattenskoter; Utombordare; Drev (I/O); Elmotor (trolling); Universell; Övrigt
hu: Vízi jármű kompatibilis motortípusa: Belső motoros; Jet-hajtómű / PWC; Külmotoros; Z-hajtómű (I/O); Trolling motor; Univerzális; Egyéb